Utah statutes.
65A-10-2.   Recreational use of sovereign lands.

(1)  The division, with the approval of the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources and the governor, may set aside for public or recreational use any part of the lands claimed by the state as the beds of lakes or streams.

(2)  Management of those lands may be delegated to the Division of Parks and Recreation, the Division of Wildlife Resources, or any other state agency.



Amended by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

